New York, session 2025-2026, A8909.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 601-c of the correction law, as added by section 2 2 of part M of chapter 56 of the laws of 2009, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 § 601-c. Felony [prisoners] incarcerated individuals; reimbursement 5 for costs. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any case where 6 a person has been convicted of a felony and a sentence has been 7 pronounced which requires that [he or she] such person be committed to 8 the custody of the commissioner, if such person has not been accepted 9 for custody by the commissioner within ten business days of receipt of a 10 written notification by the department from the appropriate local offi- 11 cial that [he or she] the commissioner is prepared to transport such 12 person to the facility designated by the department, provided that there 13 has been compliance with subdivision (a) of section six hundred one of 14 this article, and provided further that such person is not in need of 15 immediate medical care requiring the availability of a hospital or 16 infirmary bed, then the expense of maintaining such person shall be paid 17 by the state at the rate of [one] three hundred dollars per day per 18 capita for the first ten days and six hundred dollars per day per capita 19 for each day thereafter, or the actual per day per capita cost as certi- 20 fied by the appropriate local official, whichever is [less] more, begin- 21 ning with the first day of receipt of written notification by the 22 department. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13413-02-5